District of Columbia statutes.
42-2433

Fiduciary duties.

Any person who advertises, offers, promotes, or provides foreclosure rescue services to a homeowner owes a fiduciary duty to the homeowner and shall discharge that duty in accordance with all applicable laws.

Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-87, § 4, 54 DCR 11913